Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2052.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.851, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Payment rates; base wage index. deleted text begin When initially establishing the base wage component values,deleted text end new text begin (a) Effective January 1, 2026, and every two years thereafter,new text end the commissioner must deleted text begin usedeleted text end new text begin establish base wage component values usingnew text end the Minnesota-specific median wage for the standard occupational classification (SOC) codes published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics in the edition of the Occupational Handbook published deleted text begin in March 2021deleted text end new text begin in the spring approximately 21 months prior to the scheduled updatenew text end . The commissioner must calculate the base wage component values as follows deleted text begin fordeleted text end : (1) new text begin for new text end personal care assistance services, CFSS, extended personal care assistance services, and extended CFSSdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ,new text end the base wage component value equals the median wage for personal care aide (SOC code 31-1120); (2) new text begin for new text end enhanced rate personal care assistance services and enhanced rate CFSSdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ,new text end the base wage component value equals the product of median wage for personal care aide (SOC code 31-1120) and the value of the enhanced rate under section 256B.0659, subdivision 17anew text begin , for enhanced personal care assistance services and under section 256B.85, subdivision 7a, for enhanced CFSSnew text end ; and (3) new text begin for new text end qualified professional services and CFSS worker training and developmentdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ,new text end the base wage component value equals the sum of 70 percent of the median wage for registered nurse (SOC code 29-1141), 15 percent of the median wage for health care social worker (SOC code 21-1099), and 15 percent of the median wage for social and human service assistant (SOC code 21-1093). new text begin (b) The commissioner must publish the current base wage component values on the department's website. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.851, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Payment rates; total wage index. (a) The commissioner must multiply the base wage component values in subdivision 3 by one plus the appropriate competitive workforce factor. The deleted text begin product isdeleted text end new text begin products arenew text end the total wage component deleted text begin value.deleted text end new text begin values. The commissioner must publish the current total wage component values on the department's website.new text end (b) For personal care assistance services, CFSS, extended personal care assistance services, extended CFSS, enhanced rate personal care assistance services, and enhanced rate CFSS, the deleted text begin initialdeleted text end competitive workforce factor is 4.7 percent. (c) For qualified professional services and CFSS worker training and development, the competitive workforce factor is zero percent. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.851, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4a. new text end new text begin Updates to competitive workforce factors. new text end new text begin (a) Beginning January 1, 2026, and every two years thereafter, the commissioner must adjust the total wage component values in subdivision 4 by applying an updated competitive workforce factor using the most recently available data. The commissioner must calculate the biennial update to the competitive workforce factor after establishing the base wage component values required in subdivision 3. The commissioner must determine the updated competitive workforce factor by adjusting it toward the percent difference between: new text end new text begin (1) the median wage for personal care aide (SOC code 39-9021); and new text end new text begin (2) the weighted average wage for all other SOC codes with the same Bureau of Labor Statistics classifications for education, experience, and training required for job competency. new text end new text begin (b) For each biennial update of the competitive workforce factor under paragraph (a), the commissioner must not increase or decrease the competitive workforce factor from its previous value by more than three percentage points. If, after a biennial adjustment, the competitive workforce factor is less than or equal to zero, the competitive workforce factor must be zero. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner must publish the updated competitive workforce factor on the department's website. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.851, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Payment rates; component values. (a) The commissioner must use the following component values: (1) employee vacation, sick, and training factor, 8.71 percent; (2) employer taxes and workers' compensation factor, 11.56 percent; (3) employee benefits factor, 12.04 percent; (4) client programming and supports factor, 2.30 percent; (5) program plan support factor, 7.00 percent; (6) general business and administrative expenses factor, 13.25 percent; (7) program administration expenses factor, 2.90 percent; and (8) absence and utilization factor, 3.90 percent. deleted text begin (b) For purposes of implementation, the commissioner shall use the following implementation components: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) personal care assistance services and CFSS: 88.19 percent; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) enhanced rate personal care assistance services and enhanced rate CFSS: 88.19 percent; and deleted text end deleted text begin (3) qualified professional services and CFSS worker training and development: 88.19 percent. deleted text end deleted text begin (c) Effective January 1, 2025,deleted text end new text begin (b)new text end For purposes of implementation, the commissioner shall use the following implementation components: (1) personal care assistance services and CFSS: 92.08 percent; (2) enhanced rate personal care assistance services and enhanced rate CFSS: 92.08 percent; and (3) qualified professional services and CFSS worker training and development: 92.08 percent. deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end The commissioner shall use the following worker retention components: (1) for workers who have provided fewer than 1,001 cumulative hours in personal care assistance services or CFSS, the worker retention component is zero percent; (2) for workers who have provided between 1,001 and 2,000 cumulative hours in personal care assistance services or CFSS, the worker retention component is 2.17 percent; (3) for workers who have provided between 2,001 and 6,000 cumulative hours in personal care assistance services or CFSS, the worker retention component is 4.36 percent; (4) for workers who have provided between 6,001 and 10,000 cumulative hours in personal care assistance services or CFSS, the worker retention component is 7.35 percent; and (5) for workers who have provided more than 10,000 cumulative hours in personal care assistance services or CFSS, the worker retention component is 10.81 percent. deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end The commissioner shall define the appropriate worker retention component based on the total number of units billed for services rendered by the individual provider since July 1, 2017. The worker retention component must be determined by the commissioner for each individual provider and is not subject to appeal. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.851, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5a. new text end new text begin Updates to component values. new text end new text begin (a) Beginning January 1, 2026, and every two years thereafter, the commissioner must increase the implementation component values under subdivision 5 by two percentage points until each component is 100 percent. new text end new text begin (b) Beginning January 1, 2026, and every two years thereafter, the commissioner must update the client programming and supports factor in subdivision 5 for changes in the Consumer Price Index by the value of the difference between the most recent update and the data available six months and one day before the scheduled update. new text end